Nebraska, session 109, LB860.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB860 LB860
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-801, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-801 Sections 71-801 to 71-830, sections 2 to 3 of this act, and
the Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic Act shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act.
Sec. 2. (1) No later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Health
and Human Services shall establish a program that provides access and
services for individuals under twenty-one years of age who are
experiencing complex behavioral health care needs.
(2) The department shall ensure that: (a) The program addresses the
behavioral health care of individuals under twenty-one years of age who
have complex, multisystem needs, with the goals of supporting families in
the community and preventing institutionalization and out-of-home care
placement; and (b) care management under the program is delivered
according to the needs of the individual and the individual's family.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall provide the following services
within the program described in section 2 of this act, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Mobile response and stabilization;
(b) Intensive home-based treatment;
(c) Inpatient and outpatient care;
(d) Psychiatric residential treatment facility care;
(e) Substance use disorder treatment;
(f) Psychiatric care; and
(g) Developmental disability care.
(2) Care coordination shall be provided through the behavioral
health regions, as determined by the department. The department may
procure a single, statewide managed care plan that builds a sufficient
provider network to ensure access to behavioral health services,
including residential treatment and home and community-based services, in
order to provide a full continuum of behavioral health care. The
-2-

LB860 LB860
2026 2026
department or a managed care organization may manage administrative care
coordination, utilization management, and quality improvement efforts
under this section.
(3) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement sections 2 to 3 of this act and if necessary, shall submit to
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, a state plan
amendment, a waiver request, or an application for other federal approval
necessary to provide reimbursement through the medical assistance program
for the behavioral health care services described in this section.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-801, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-